Missouri, session 2026, HB2809.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 144, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 144.052, to read as follows:
144.052. 1. As used in this section, the term "campground" shall mean any
parcel or tract of land, including buildings and other structures, where five or more
campsites are made available for use as temporary living quarters for recreational,
camping, travel, or seasonal use. The term "campground" shall also include
recreational vehicle parks.
2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in addition to all other
exemptions granted under this chapter, there is hereby specifically exempted from the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 and sections 144.600 to 144.761 and the local
sales tax law as defined in section 32.085 and from the computation of the tax levied,
assessed, or payable under sections 144.010 to 144.525 and sections 144.600 to 144.761
and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085, fees or charges for rental of lots,
buildings, other structures, and amenities in a campground. The provisions of this
section shall be in addition to any other sales or use tax exemptions provided by law.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.